Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1274
Legal notices; proof of publication.

Publications required by law to be made in a newspaper or on a statewide website established and maintained as a repository of public notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers, may be proved by affidavit of any person having knowledge of the fact, specifying the time when and the paper in which or the website whereon the publication was made, and, if made by publication in a newspaper, that such newspaper is a legal newspaper under the statutes of the State of Nebraska, but such affidavit must, for the purposes now contemplated, be made within six months after the last day of publication, in the office where the original affidavit of publication is required to be filed.

R.S.1867, Code § 403, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 7967;

Laws 1922, Spec. Sess., c. 11, § 1, p. 80;

C.S.1922, § 8908;

C.S.1929, § 20-1274;

R.S.1943, § 25-1274;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 5.

Affidavit need not state particulars as to circulation of newspaper or number of weeks published prior to sale; it is sufficient if in language of this section. Seymour v. Lawson, 111 Neb. 770, 197 N.W. 623 (1924).

Proof of publication must be made within six months after the last day of publication. Lonergan v. City of South Omaha, 72 Neb. 317, 100 N.W. 407 (1904).

Publication affidavit is not sufficiently authenticated if it lacks signature of an officer to the jurat. Holmes v. Crooks, 56 Neb. 466, 76 N.W. 1073 (1898).

Proof of publication of notice or order of sale may be made by affidavit of one who has knowledge of fact. Johnson v. Colby, 52 Neb. 327, 72 N.W. 313 (1897).